Utah statutes.
70A-4a-304.   Duty of sender to report erroneously executed payment order.
If the sender of a payment order that is erroneously executed as stated in
Section 70A-4a-303 receives notification from the receiving bank that the
order was executed or that the sender's account was debited with respect to
the order, the sender has a duty to exercise ordinary care to determine, on
the basis of information available to the sender, that the order was
erroneously executed and to notify the bank of the relevant facts within a
reasonable time not exceeding 90 days after the notification from the bank was
received by the sender.  If the sender fails to perform that duty, the bank is
not obliged to pay interest on any amount that is refundable to the sender
under Subsection 70A-4a-402 (4) for the period before the bank learns of the
execution error.  The bank is not entitled to any recovery from the sender on
account of a failure by the sender to perform the duty stated in this section.
